District of Columbia statutes.
9-801

Construction and operation of Airport authorized.

The Administrator of the Federal Aviation Agency (hereinafter referred to as the “Administrator”) is hereby authorized and directed to construct, protect, operate, improve, and maintain within or in the vicinity of the District of Columbia, a public airport (including all buildings and other structures necessary or desirable therefor).

Sept. 7, 1950, 64 Stat. 770, ch. 905, § 1
Aug. 23, 1958, 72 Stat. 807, Pub. L. 85-726, title XIV, § 1402(g)

History

1981 Ed., § 7-1201.
1973 Ed., § 7-1401.

Prior Codifications

The functions of the Administrator of the Federal Aviation Agency were transferred to the Secretary of Transportation by § 6(c)(1) of the Act of October 15, 1966, Pub. L. 89-670. The Federal Aviation Agency was abolished and a new Federal Aviation Administration in the Department of Transportation was created by §§ 3(e)(1) and 9(f) of that Act.

Transfer of Functions

Metropolitan Washington Airports Authority established: D.C. Law 6-67, effective December 3, 1985, endorsed on behalf of the District government the creation of a regional airport authority to acquire Washington National Airport and Washington Dulles International Airport from the federal government. D.C. Law 6-67 was amended by D.C. Law 7-18, effective July 25, 1987.

D.C. Law 6-67 was amended by D.C. Law 8-179, effective October 2, 1990.

Metropolitan Washington Airports Authority established: D.C. Law 6-67 was amended, on a temporary basis, by § 2 of D.C. Law 9-48.

Section 4(b) of D.C. Law 9-48 provided that the act shall expire on the 225th day of its having taken effect or upon the effective date of the District of Columbia Regional Airports Authority Act of 1985 Amendment Act of 1991, whichever occurs first.

D.C. Law 6-67 was temporarily amended by the District of Columbia Regional Airports Authority Act of 1985 Emergency Amendment Act of 1991 (D.C. Act 9-72, July 24, 1991, 38 DCR 4959) and by § 2 of the District of Columbia Regional Airports Authority Act of 1985 Congressional Recess Emergency Amendment Act of 1992 (D.C. Act 9-275, July 23, 1992, 39 DCR 5849).

D.C. Law 8-179 was temporarily repealed by § 3 of the District of Columbia Regional Airports Authority Act of 1985 Emergency Amendment Act of 1991 (D.C. Act 9-72, July 24, 1991, 38 DCR 4959) and by § 3 of the District of Columbia Regional Airports Authority Act of 1985 Congressional Recess Emergency Amendment Act of 1992 (D.C. Act 9-275, July 23, 1992, 39 DCR 5849).

D.C. Law 6-67 was amended by D.C. Law 9-158, effective September 29, 1992.

D.C. Law 8-179 was repealed, on a temporary basis, by § 3 of D.C. Law 9-48.

D.C. Law 8-179 was repealed by § 3 of D.C. Law 9-158.

Metropolitan Washington Airports Authority established: D.C. Law 6-67 was amended by D.C. Law 12-8, effective August 1, 1997.

Metropolitan Washington Airports Authority established: D.C. Law 6-67 was amended on a temporary basis by § 2 of D.C. Law 12-199.

Section 4(b) of D.C. Law 12-199 provided that the act shall expire after 225 days of its having taken effect.

D.C. Law 6-67 was temporarily amended by § 2 of the Regional Airports Authority Emergency Amendment Act of 1998 (D.C. Act 12-436, July 31, 1998, 45 DCR 5746),§ 2 of the Regional Airports Authority Legislative Review Emergency Amendment Act of 1998 (D.C. Act 12-502, November 10, 1998, 45 DCR 8125), and § 2 of the Regional Airports Authority Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 1998 (D.C. Act 12-578, January 12, 1999, 46 DCR 964).

Editor's Notes